Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-977
School district expenditures; not exempt from limitations on spending.

Any expenditure made by a school district pursuant to sections 79-934, 79-968, and 79-973 as changed by Laws 1993, LB 292, shall be considered a general fund expenditure of the district and shall not be exempt from the growth limitations placed on district spending by the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.

Laws 1993, LB 292, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1567;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 612;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 46.

Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act, see section 79-1001.